South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4810.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 9, Title 11 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 11-9-150.  Notwithstanding any other provision of law, no funds appropriated or authorized by the General Assembly to any state agency, department, or institution may be used to purchase food or drink products unless such food and drink products are eligible for purchase using Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) benefits. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----